South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4293.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 29, Title 6 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 6-29-815.  If a local governing body, local planning commission, zoning administrator, or board of zoning appeals makes an advisory or final determination that the current or intended use of a property is not permitted under the applicable zoning classification, including a determination that the use requires rezoning or is otherwise prohibited: (1) all permits previously issued for the development, construction, or occupancy of the property are no longer valid, regardless of the date of issuance or the reliance placed upon such permits; (2) any ongoing development or construction activity must cease immediately and may not resume unless and until: (a) the property is brought into compliance with the applicable zoning ordinances, including any required rezoning or variance; or (b) a court of competent jurisdiction authorizes construction or development to proceed pending final resolution, and may impose such conditions or penalties as authorized by law; and (3) the suspension of construction and permitting applies upon the issuance of any advisory or binding zoning determination, including a reversal by a board of zoning appeals or other competent zoning authority, and shall remain in effect throughout the pendency of any administrative or judicial appeal unless a court orders otherwise. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----